Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.780

Laws, rules and regulations applicable to cities five hundred thousand or over deemed applicable to cities four hundred thousand or over.

On and after June 12, 1975, every law and rule or regulation of the state or any agency thereof which immediately prior to June 12, 1975 related to cities of five hundred thousand population or over shall be deemed to be applicable to cities of four hundred thousand population or over.

[ 1975 c 33 s 1.]

NOTES:

Severability—1975 c 33: "If any provision of this 1975 amendatory act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1975 c 33 s 7.]